North Carolina, session 2025, HB1152.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 99D-1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 99D-1. Interference with Civil Rights.
…
(a1) A person who is injured during civil immigration enforcement by another person who,
whether or not under color of law, violates the United States or North Carolina Constitution while
participating in civil immigration enforcement may bring a civil action against the other person.
Any of the remedies outlined in subsection (b) of this section are available to the injured person.
To the maximum extent permissible under the United States Constitution, a grant of immunity to
a defendant, including, but not limited to, sovereign immunity; official immunity;
intergovernmental immunity; qualified immunity; Supremacy Clause immunity; statutory
immunity; or common law immunity, does not apply in an action brought pursuant to this
subsection.
(b) Any person whose exercise or enjoyment of a right described in subdivision (a)(1) or
subsection (a1) of this section has been interfered with, or against whom an attempt has been
made to interfere with the exercise or enjoyment of such a right, by a violation of this Chapter
may bring a civil action. The court may restrain and enjoin such future acts, and may award
compensatory and punitive damages to the plaintiff. The court may award court costs and
attorneys' fees to the prevailing party. However, a prevailing defendant may be awarded
reasonable attorneys' fees only upon a showing that the case is frivolous, unreasonable, or without
foundation.
…."
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to design and prepare a downloadable pamphlet, entitled "Know Your
Rights." The pamphlet shall include a summary of the rights of immigrants and citizens who
encounter immigration enforcement officers. The pamphlet shall be written in plain language and
available for download on any State agency, department, or institution website that coordinates
*H1152-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
with or works with U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement or U.S. Customs and Border
Protection.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1152-First Edition